Utah statutes.
50-2-1.   Business of gathering and vending news a matter of public interest.

All persons, all associations of persons and all corporations engaged in the business of buying, gathering or accumulating information or news for publication, and vending, supplying, distributing or disseminating the same for publication, either to the members of such associations or corporations or otherwise, shall be deemed to be engaged in a business upon which a public interest is engrafted, and shall make no distinction with respect to newspaper publishers desiring to purchase such news or information for publication.

